Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB133.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2502(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2502. Relinquishment to adult intending to adopt child.(a) Petition.--When any child under the age of 18 years has been for a minimum period of three days in the exclusive care of an adult or adults who have filed a report of intention to adopt required by section 2531 (relating to report of intention to adopt), or when a petition for reinstatement of parental rights has been filed under Chapter 30 (relating to reinstatement of parental rights), the parent or parents of the child may petition the court for permission to relinquish forever all 12345678910111213141516171819 parental rights to their child.* * *Section 2. Section 2504 of Title 23 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2504. Alternative procedure for relinquishment.* * *(a.1) Petition to confirm consent to reinstatement of parental rights.--If the parent or parents of the child have executed consents to reinstatement of parental rights under Chapter 30 (relating to reinstatement of parental rights), upon petition by a party under section 3001(a) (relating to petition), the court shall hold a hearing for the purpose of confirming a consent to reinstatement of parental rights. The original consent or consents shall be attached to the petition.* * *Section 3. Section 2512(b)(3) of Title 23 is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2512. Petition for involuntary termination.(a) Who may file.--A petition to terminate parental rights with respect to a child under the age of 18 years may be filed by any of the following:* * *(5) A party under section 3001(a) (relating to petition) or an attorney representing the party.(b) Contents.--The following apply:* * *(3) If the petitioner is a parent and section 2514 (relating to special provisions when child conceived as a result of rape or incest) applies, or if the petitioner is an agency, or if the petitioner is a party under section 20250HB0133PN3644 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3001(a), the petitioner shall not be required to aver that an adoption is presently contemplated nor that a person with a present intention to adopt exists.* * *Section 4. Title 23 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 30REINSTATEMENT OF PARENTAL RIGHTSSec.3000. VENUE.3001. Petition.3002. Representation.3003. Hearing.3004. Orders.§ 3000. VENUE.PROCEEDINGS FOR REINSTATEMENT MAY BE BROUGHT IN THE COURT OF THE COUNTY:(1) WHERE THE CHILD RESIDES.(2) IN WHICH IS LOCATED AN OFFICE OF AN AGENCY HAVING CUSTODY OR IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE AGENCY HAVING PLACED THE CHILD IS LOCATED.(3) WITH THE LEAVE OF COURT IN WHICH THE CHILD FORMERLY RESIDED.§ 3001. Petition.(a) Persons who may file.--The following persons may file a petition with the court under this chapter to reinstate the parental rights of a former parent whose parental rights were terminated by the agency under Subchapter A of Chapter 25 (relating to voluntary relinquishment) or Subchapter B of Chapter 25 (relating to involuntary termination) , unless the former parent's parental rights were previously involuntarily 20250HB0133PN3644 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminated under section 2511(a)(7), (9), (10) or (11) (relating to grounds for involuntary termination) : (1) the agency;(2) if the child is at least 14 years of age, the child, former child or an attorney representing the child who is the subject of the petition; or(3) the former parent whose parental rights were voluntarily relinquished or involuntarily terminated, or an attorney representing the former parent . (b) Requirements.--A petition for reinstatement of parental rights may be filed under this chapter only if:(1) the termination of parental rights resulted from a petition filed by the agency;(2) the order terminating parental rights is final ; and (3) at least 15 months have elapsed since entry of the order terminating parental rights, or the child is at least 17 years of age, and AT LEAST one of the following applies: (i) the child IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE AGENCY AND has not been adopted and no petition for adoption has been filed; OR (ii) the child is in the custody of the agency;(iii) the child is no longer in the care of the adoptive parent and the adoptive parent is not performing parental duties and reunification with the adoptive parent is not imminent ; (iv) a petition under section 2501 (relating to relinquishment to agency), 2502 (relating to relinquishment to adult intending to adopt child) or 2504 (relating to alternative procedure for relinquishment) regarding the adoptive parent has been filed or will be 20250HB0133PN3644 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filed; or(v) a petition under section 2512 (relating to petition for involuntary termination) regarding the adoptive parent has been filed or will be filed.(II) THE CHILD WAS ADOPTED AND IS NOT IN THE CUSTODY OF THE ADOPTED PARENT AND ONE OF THE FOLLOWING APPLIES:(A) A PETITION UNDER SECTION 2501 (RELATING TO RELINQUISHMENT TO AGENCY), 2502 (RELATING TO RELINQUISHMENT TO ADULT INTENDING TO ADOPT CHILD) OR 2504 (RELATING TO ALTERNATIVE PROCEDURE FOR RELINQUISHMENT) REGARDING THE ADOPTIVE PARENT HAS BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED; OR(B) A PETITION UNDER SECTION 2512 (RELATING TO PETITION FOR INVOLUNTARY TERMINATION) REGARDING THE ADOPTIVE PARENT HAS BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED.(c) Content.--The contents of the petition for reinstatement of parental rights must be sworn by the petitioner and include the following information:(1) the name of the petitioner;(2) the name, date of birth and current residence address of the former parent whose parental rights are sought to be reinstated;(3) the child's name, or last known name and, if known, date and place of birth and current address;(4) a statement of the grounds on which the court rendered the order terminating the former parent's parental rights;(5) a summary statement of the facts and evidence that the petitioner believes demonstrate the former parent whose parental rights are sought to be reinstated is willing and 20250HB0133PN3644 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 able to provide day-to-day care and maintain the child's health, safety and welfare ; (6) a statement of the former parent whose parental rights are sought to be reinstated requesting the reinstatement of parental rights ; (7) if the child is 12 years of age or older, a statement whether the child consents to the reinstatement of parental rights or an averment that, despite good faith efforts, the child's position cannot be ascertained;(8) a statement about why reinstatement of parental rights would be in the best interest of the child;(9) a summary of any prior request or motion for reinstatement by the former parent whose parental rights are sought to be reinstated and, if the former parent is not the petitioner, by the petitioner with respect to the child ; and (10) if the child has been adopted, an averment stating whether a petition regarding the EACH adoptive parent under section 2501, 2502 or 2504, or a petition under section 2512, has been or will be filed , and whether it OR is filed concurrently with or before the petition for reinstatement of parental rights.(d) Notice.--The court shall serve the petition for reinstatement of parental rights and notice of hearing on:(1) the child or the child's representative;(2) the agency attorney;(3) the child's attorney;(4) if the former parent is not the petitioner, the former parent whose parental rights are sought to be reinstated;(5) the EACH adoptive parent, unless parental rights 20250HB0133PN3644 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have already been terminated; and (6) if the child is subject to the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (Public Law 95-608, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq.), the designated tribal service agent of the child's tribe and any other person entitled to notice under Federal law.(e) Investigation.--When a petition for reinstatement of parental rights has been filed, the court may cause an investigation to be made and a report to be filed by a local public child care agency, a voluntary child care agency with the court's consent or an appropriate person designated by the court. The following shall apply:(1) The investigation shall cover all pertinent information regarding the child's eligibility for reinstatement of parental rights and the suitability of the home, including A N ASSESSMENT OF THE HOME ENVIRONMENT, the physical, mental and emotional needs and welfare of the child AND THE FORMER PARENT'S CAPACITY TO MEET THE CHILD'S NEEDS . (2) The court may establish the procedure for the payment of costs of the investigation. The costs shall be waived for parties eligible for in forma pauperis status.§ 3002. Representation.(a) Child.--The court shall appoint counsel or a guardian ad litem to represent the child in a proceeding under this chapter. A guardian ad litem shall be an attorney at law and shall represent the child's legal and best interests. The following shall apply:(1) If the child's legal and best interests conflict, the guardian ad litem may move the court to be appointed as legal counsel and for appointment of a separate guardian ad litem.20250HB0133PN3644 - 7 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the child is already represented by counsel or a guardian ad litem, the court shall appoint the same attorney or attorneys to represent the child in proceedings under this chapter.(b) Former parent.--(1) The court shall appoint counsel for a former parent in a proceeding under this chapter if, upon petition of the former parent, the court determines:(i) the former parent is unable to pay for counsel; or(ii) payment would result in substantial financial hardship.(2) The court shall appoint counsel on behalf of the former parent no later than upon service of notice of the petition as required in section 3001 (relating to petition).(C) ADOPTIVE PARENT.--(1) THE COURT SHALL APPOINT COUNSEL FOR EACH ADOPTIVE PARENT IN A PROCEEDING UNDER THIS CHAPTER IF, UPON PETITION OF AN ADOPTIVE PARENT, THE COURT DETERMINES:(I) THE ADOPTIVE PARENT IS UNABLE TO PAY FOR COUNSEL; OR(II) PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN SUBSTANTIAL FINANCIAL HARDSHIP.(2) THE COURT SHALL APPOINT COUNSEL ON BEHALF OF EACH ADOPTIVE PARENT NO LATER THAN UPON SERVICE OF NOTICE OF THE PETITION AS REQUIRED IN SECTION 3001.§ 3003. Hearing.(a) Prehearing conference.-- Upon the filing of a petition under this chapter, the court shall conduct a prehearing conference not later than 30 days after filing to determine 20250HB0133PN3644 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compliance with sections 3001 (relating to petition) and 3002 (relating to representation), identify the issues for hearing and resolve discovery matters. The following shall apply:(1) If the petitioner fails to appear, the court shall dismiss the petition.(2) If the child is in the custody of the agency, the agency shall file with the court and serve on all parties and counsel a report identifying the services and supports the family receives or will receive. The report shall be filed and served not later than the prehearing conference. The prehearing conference shall be held no later than 30 days after the filing of the petition.(3) If the court determines that the requirements of sections 3001 and 3002 have been met, the court shall schedule an evidentiary hearing not later than 60 days after the prehearing conference.(b) Procedure.--(1) The court shall hold a hearing under this chapter not later than 60 days after the prehearing conference under subsection (a) . (2) The petitioner has the burden of proof in the hearing, and each party may call witnesses and present evidence.(3) If the child is 12 years of age or older, the child shall appear at the hearing. If the child is under 12 years of age, the court may, for good cause shown, waive the child's appearance. On motion of a party or on its own motion, the court shall permit the child to testify via video.(4) Subject to subsection (c), the court may grant the 20250HB0133PN3644 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petition and order reinstatement of the former parent's parental rights only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence the following factors:(i) reinstatement of parental rights is in the child's best interests;(ii) material changes in circumstances related to the termination of parental rights which have occurred since the date of the termination of parental rights;(iii) at least one of the following applies: (A) the child has not been adopted;(B) the child is no longer in the care of the adoptive parent;(C) a decree under section 2503(c) (relating to hearing) terminating the EACH adoptive parent's rights has been entered or is entered concurrently; or(D) (C) a decree under section 2513(d) (relating to hearing) terminating the EACH adoptive parent's rights has been entered or is entered concurrently; (iv) if the child is 12 years of age or older, the child consents to the reinstatement and desires to reside with the FORMER parent; and (v) the former parent is willing and able to provide day-to-day care and maintain the child's health, safety and welfare . (c) Additional considerations by the court.--In determining whether to grant a petition under this chapter relating to a child who is under 12 years of age on the date the petition is filed, the court shall consider, in addition to the factors described in subsection (b)(4) : 20250HB0133PN3644 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the child's age, maturity and ability to express a preference; and(2) the child's preference regarding the reinstatement.(d) Related proceedings.--If a petition under section 2501 (relating to relinquishment to agency), 2502 (relating to relinquishment to adult intending to adopt child), 2504 (relating to alternative procedure for relinquishment) or 2512 (relating to petition for involuntary termination) has been filed regarding the adoptive parent, the court shall hold the hearing required by section 2503 or 2513 on that petition before or concurrently with the hearing under this chapter.(e) Consents when child adopted.--(1) If the child has been adopted and the EACH adoptive parent is not deceased, reinstatement under this chapter requires the consent of:(i) the EACH adoptive parent; and (ii) the child, if 12 years of age or older.(2) A consent executed outside this Commonwealth is valid if executed in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction where executed. A consent to reinstatement may be revoked only as provided in this paragraph. Revocation shall be in writing and served upon the agency or adult to whom the child was relinquished. The following shall apply:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii), a consent to reinstatement executed by an EACH adoptive parent is irrevocable more than 30 days after execution. (ii) A person may not waive the revocation period under subparagraph (i).(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i):(A) A person who executed a consent to 20250HB0133PN3644 - 11 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reinstatement may challenge its validity only by filing a petition alleging fraud or duress within the earlier of 60 days after execution of the consent or 30 days after entry of the reinstatement decree.(B) A consent may be invalidated only upon proof of fraud or duress by a preponderance of the evidence if the consenter was 21 years of age or younger, or by clear and convincing evidence in all other cases.(3) The following shall apply:(i) The consent of an EACH adoptive parent for a child under 18 years of age shall set forth the name, age and marital status of the parent, the relationship of the consenter to the child, the name of the other parent or parents of the child and the following:I hereby voluntarily and unconditionally consent to the reinstatement of parental rights of the above named child.I understand that by signing this consent I indicate my intent to permanently give up all rights to this child.I understand such child will have the parental rights of the former parent reinstated.I understand I may revoke this consent to permanently give up all rights to this child by placing the revocation in writing and serving it upon the agency or adult to whom the child was relinquished.I understand that this consent to reinstatement of parental rights is irrevocable unless I revoke it within 30 days after executing it by delivering a 20250HB0133PN3644 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 written revocation to (insert the name and address of the agency coordinating the reinstatement of parental rights) or (insert the name and address of an attorney who represents the individual relinquishing parental rights or the former parent seeking reinstatement of parental rights of the child) or (insert the court of the county in which the voluntary relinquishment form was or will be filed).I have read and understand the above and I am signing it as a free and voluntary act.(ii) The consent shall include the date and place of execution and the names, addresses and signatures of at least two witnesses and their relationship to the consenter. The consent of an incarcerated parent of an adoptee may be witnessed by a correctional facility employee designated by the facility, and any such consent shall list the facility's address. In lieu of two witnesses, a consent may be acknowledged before a notary public.§ 3004. Orders.(a) Time period.--Not later than 30 days after a hearing under this chapter, the court shall render a written order granting or denying the petition . (b) Grant of petition.--If the court renders an order granting the petition, the court shall enter the court's findings and detailed reasons for the grant of the petition. The order shall state that all legal rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations of the former parent regarding the child, including with respect to custody, care, control and support, are reinstated . 20250HB0133PN3644 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Denial of petition.--If the court renders an order denying the petition, the order shall include: (1) the court's findings and detailed reasons for denial of the petition; and(2) a statement prohibiting the filing of a subsequent petition with respect to the former parent's parental rights before the first anniversary of the date the order of denial was issued.(d) Separate decree required if child adopted.--If the child has been adopted, a decree under section 2503(c) (relating to hearing), 2504(c) (relating to alternative procedure for relinquishment) or 2513(d) (relating to hearing) shall be required before a decree may be entered under this chapter.(e) Effect on other former parent.--The grant of a petition reinstating one former parent's parental rights shall not restore or otherwise affect the rights of any other former parent.(f) Support liability.--A parent whose rights are reinstated under this section shall not be liable for child support or the cost of services provided to the child for the period from the date of the order terminating the parent's rights to the date of the order reinstating the parent's rights.(g) Application.--This section shall apply retroactively to a child who is under the jurisdiction of the court at the time of the hearing, regardless of the date on which parental rights were terminated.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0133PN3644 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627